Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 2214XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 194 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 Educator supplement for all 1 fund ââ teacher and staff pay ââ appropriation. 2 1. a. An educator supplement for all fund is established 3 in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by 4 the department and shall consist of moneys appropriated by 5 the general assembly and any other moneys received by the 6 department for deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are 7 appropriated and made available to the department to be used 8 for meeting the requirements of this section. 9 b. The department shall distribute moneys from the fund to 10 school districts established pursuant to chapter 274 in amounts 11 necessary to ensure that school districts compensate employees 12 and teachers in accordance with this section. 13 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for each 14 succeeding fiscal year, there is appropriated from the general 15 fund of the state to the educator supplement for all fund the 16 amount necessary to make all distributions required under 17 paragraph âbâ for the fiscal year. 18 2. a. (1) Subject to paragraph âbâ , each school district 19 shall pay to each employee with a license, endorsement, 20 certification, authorization, or statement of recognition 21 issued by the board of educational examiners who has been 22 employed by the school district for at least one year, and who 23 has completed all periods of conditional employment with the 24 school district, five thousand dollars each year in addition 25 to the employeeâs base salary. 26 (2) Subparagraph (1) shall not require a school district to 27 pay any amounts in addition to an employeeâs base salary if the 28 employee holds an administrator license issued by the board of 29 educational examiners and is employed by the school district in 30 an administrative role. 31 b. Each school district shall pay to each employee who 32 serves as a teaching assistant an amount equal to ten percent 33 of the employeeâs current annual salary each year in addition 34 to the employeeâs base salary. 35 -1- LSB 2214XS (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 194 c. If an employee qualifies for a payment from a school 1 district under paragraphs âaâ and âbâ , the school district 2 shall pay the employee the greater of the amount required under 3 paragraph âaâ or âbâ , but not both. 4 3. Each school district shall apply to the department for a 5 distribution of moneys pursuant to this section. 6